Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.100

Tuition and fees set by individual institutions—Limitations—Tuition and fees for certain part-time, additional time, and out-of-state students.

(1) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges shall charge to and collect from each of the students registering at the particular institution for any quarter or semester such tuition fees and services and activities fees, and other fees as such board shall in its discretion determine. For the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College, the total of all fees shall be rounded to the nearest whole dollar amount: PROVIDED, That such tuition fees shall be established in accordance with RCW 28B.15.067.

(2) Part-time students shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees proportionate to full-time student rates established for residents and nonresidents: PROVIDED, That except for students registered at community and technical colleges, students registered for fewer than two credit hours shall be charged tuition and services and activities fees at the rate established for two credit hours: PROVIDED FURTHER, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, residents of Idaho or Oregon who are enrolled in community college district number twenty for six or fewer credits during any quarter or semester may be exempted from payment of all or a portion of the nonresident tuition fees differential upon a declaration by the office of student financial assistance that it finds Washington residents from the community college district are afforded substantially equivalent treatment by such other states.

(3) Full-time students registered for more than eighteen credit hours shall be charged an additional operating fee for each credit hour in excess of eighteen hours at the applicable established per credit hour tuition fee rate for part-time students: PROVIDED, That, subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities and the community and technical colleges may exempt all or a portion of the additional charge, for students who are registered exclusively in first professional programs in medicine, dental medicine, veterinary medicine, doctor of pharmacy, or law, or who are registered exclusively in required courses in vocational preparatory programs.

[ 2015 c 55 s 213; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 151; 2011 c 274 s 5; 2003 c 232 s 6; 1999 c 321 s 2; 1998 c 75 s 1; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 8; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 7; 1992 c 231 s 6. Prior: 1985 c 390 s 18; 1985 c 370 s 67; 1982 1st ex.s. c 37 s 11; 1981 c 257 s 5; 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 36; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.100; prior: (i) 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 31, part. Formerly RCW 28.85.310, part. (ii) 1963 c 181 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 10 s 1, part; 1959 c 186 s 1, part; 1947 c 243 s 1, part; 1945 c 187 s 1, part; 1933 c 169 s 1, part; 1931 c 48 s 1, part; 1921 c 139 s 1, part; 1919 c 63 s 1, part; 1915 c 66 s 2, part; RRS s 4546, part. Formerly RCW 28.77.030, part. (iii) 1963 c 180 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 11 s 1, part; 1949 c 73 s 1, part; 1931 c 49 s 1, part; 1921 c 164 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 4569, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.030, part. (iv) 1967 c 47 s 10, part; 1965 ex.s. c 147 s 1, part; 1963 c 143 s 1, part; 1961 ex.s. c 13 s 3, part. Formerly RCW 28.81.080, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Finding—Intent—2011 c 274: See note following RCW 28B.50.515.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Intent—1999 c 321: "The legislature recognizes that certain tuition policies may have an adverse impact on the unique role of community colleges.

Therefore, it is the intent of the legislature to eliminate impediments to the ability of community colleges to meet the diverse needs of students and business interests." [ 1999 c 321 s 1.]

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 37: See notes following RCW 28B.15.012.

Severability—1981 c 257: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 322: See note following RCW 28B.15.065.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.